Idaho, session 2026, H0906.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the State Board of Education for Community
Colleges the following amounts to be expended according to the designated
programs and expense classes from the General Fund for the period July 1,
2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
College of Eastern Idaho $167,400 $167,400
College of Southern Idaho 104,200 $319,600 423,800
College of Western Idaho 453,800 453,800
North Idaho College 233,700 90,000 323,700
TOTAL $959,100 $409,600 $1,368,700
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
appropriation to the State Board of Education for Community Colleges is
hereby reduced by the following amounts from the General Fund from operating
expenditures for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FROM:
College of Eastern Idaho $26,700
College of Southern Idaho 101,600
College of Western Idaho 71,000
North Idaho College 46,200
TOTAL $245,500
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.